Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5734
Department of Revenue; estimate of sales tax refunds; duties.

The Department of Revenue shall, on or before the fifteenth day of October and February of every year and the fifteenth day of April in odd-numbered years, make an estimate of the amount of sales and use tax refunds to be paid under the Nebraska Advantage Act during the fiscal years to be forecast under section 77-27,158. The estimate shall be based on the most recent data available, including pending and approved applications and updates thereof as are required by subdivisions (2)(e) and (5)(e) of section 77-5723. The estimate shall be forwarded to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst and the Nebraska Economic Forecasting Advisory Board and made a part of the advisory forecast required by section 77-27,158.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 56.